Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.060

Limitations on revenue development areas. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

The designation of a revenue development area is subject to the following limitations:

(1) The taxable real property within the revenue development area boundaries may not exceed one billion dollars in assessed value at the time the revenue development area is designated;

(2) The average assessed value per square foot of taxable land within the revenue development area boundaries, as of January 1st of the year the application is submitted to the board under RCW 39.102.040, may not exceed seventy dollars at the time the revenue development area is designated;

(3) No revenue development area shall have within its geographic boundaries any part of a hospital benefit zone under chapter 39.100 RCW or any part of another revenue development area created under this chapter;

(4) A revenue development area is limited to contiguous tracts, lots, pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of islands of property not included in the revenue development area;

(5) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels where economic growth is unlikely to occur;

(6) The public improvements financed through local infrastructure financing must be located in the revenue development area;

(7) A revenue development area cannot comprise an area containing more than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of the taxable real property within the boundaries of the sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring local government, at the time the revenue development area is designated;

(8) The boundaries of the revenue development area shall not be changed for the time period that local infrastructure financing is used; and

(9) A revenue development area cannot include any part of an increment area created under chapter 39.89 RCW, except those increment areas created prior to January 1, 2006.

[ 2007 c 229 s 4; 2006 c 181 s 204.]

NOTES:

Application—Severability—2007 c 229: See notes following RCW 39.102.020.